South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3065.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 6, Chapter 11, Title 16 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 16-11-460. An order concerning a defendant's motion for immunity from prosecution pursuant to the provisions of this article is immediately appealable. A defendant who does not immediately appeal an order denying a request for immunity has nevertheless preserved the issue for appeal after conviction and sentencing. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----